Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1063.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Appropriation; department of transportation; U.S. Route 70; safety improvements The sum of $11,100,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation for safety improvements on U.S. Route 70 between Mile Post 255 and Mile Post 301.